Hawaii statutes.
[§346G-9] Penalties for failure to pay
the hospital sustainability fee. (a) If a hospital fails to pay
the full amount of any hospital sustainability fee when due, there shall be
added to the fee, unless waived by the department for reasonable cause, a
penalty equal to prime plus two per cent of the fee that was not paid when due.
Any subsequent payments shall be credited first to unpaid fee amounts
beginning with the most delinquent installment rather than to penalty or
interest amounts.

(b) In addition to the penalty imposed by
subsection (a), the department may seek any of the following remedies for the
failure of any hospital to pay its fee when due:

(1) Withholding any medical assistance reimbursement
payments until such time as the fee amount is paid in full;

(2) Suspension or revocation of the hospital license;
or

(3) Development of a plan that requires the hospital
to pay any delinquent fee in installments. [L 2012, c 217, pt of §2, §5; am L
2013, c 141, pt of §1, §2; am L 2014, c 123, §2; am L 2015, c 70, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next